Utah statutes.
13-34-109.   Discontinuance of operations -- Filing of transcripts.

(1)  If a proprietary school elects to discontinue its operations in this state, the proprietor or administrator of the school shall file with the division a copy of each student's grade transcript in either written or microfilm form, relating to all courses of instruction and all students enrolled in the school during the previous 10 years.

(2)  The responsibility to file records under this section is enforceable by injunction issued by a court of competent jurisdiction in an action brought upon the request of the division or, on his own initiative, by the attorney general or by the county attorney of the county in which the proprietary school is or was operating.

(3)  The division shall maintain for at least 10 years a file of all records received by it under this section.

